apertium-pl-uk.pl.dix
    <pardef n="BASE__nasz">
      <e>       <p><l>z</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zego</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zemu</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zego</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zym</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zym</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>z</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ze</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zych</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zym</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ze</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zymi</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zych</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ze</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>z</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zego</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zemu</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>z</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zym</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zym</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>z</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ze</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zych</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zym</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ze</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zymi</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zych</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ze</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>z</l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zego</l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zemu</l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zego</l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zym</l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zym</l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>z</l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zych</l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zym</l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zych</l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zymi</l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zych</l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l><r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>za</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zej</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zej</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zą</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zą</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zej</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>za</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ze</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zych</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zym</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ze</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zymi</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zych</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ze</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ze</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zego</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zemu</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ze</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zym</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zym</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ze</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ze</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zych</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zym</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ze</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zymi</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>zych</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ze</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nas/z__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__nasz"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nas/z__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>z<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__nasz"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Conjunctions -->
    <pardef n="i__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
	      <l></l>
	      <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
	    </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="że__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
	      <l></l>
	      <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
	    </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="by__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
	      <l></l>
	      <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
	    </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	      <l>m</l>
	      <r><s n="cnjsub"/><j/>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	    </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	      <l>ś</l>
	      <r><s n="cnjsub"/><j/>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	    </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	      <l>śmy</l>
	      <r><s n="cnjsub"/><j/>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	    </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	      <l>ście</l>
	      <r><s n="cnjsub"/><j/>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	    </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="jeśli__cnjadv">
      <e>
        <p>
	      <l></l>
	      <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r>
	    </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

	<!-- Adverbs -->
    <pardef n="gdzie__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
	      <l></l>
	      <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r>
	    </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gdzie__rel">
      <e>
        <p>
	      <l></l>
	      <r><s n="rel"/><s n="adv"/></r>
	    </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="zbyt__preadv">
      <e>
        <p>
	      <l></l>
	      <r><s n="preadv"/></r>
	    </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="co__rel">
      <e>
        <p>
	      <l></l>
	      <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	    </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tu__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
	      <l></l>
	      <r><s n="adv"/></r>
	    </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dobrze__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
	      <l></l>
	      <r><s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/></r>
	    </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="że"><i>że</i><par n="że__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="aż"><i>aż</i><par n="że__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="by"><i>by</i><par n="by__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="gdyby"><i>gdyby</i><par n="by__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="kiedy"><i>kiedy</i><par n="by__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="aby"><i>aby</i><par n="by__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="żeby"><i>żeby</i><par n="by__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="dopóki"><i>dopóki</i><par n="że__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="póki"><i>póki</i><par n="że__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="dopóty"><i>dopóty</i><par n="że__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="iż"><i>iż</i><par n="że__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="gdy"><i>gdy</i><par n="że__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="i"><i>i</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="a"><i>a</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="oraz"><i>oraz</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="czy"><i>czy</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="niż"><i>niż</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="lub"><i>lub</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="lecz"><i>lecz</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="zarówno"><i>zarówno</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="bądź"><i>bądź</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="dlatego"><i>dlatego</i><par n="jeśli__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="bowiem"><i>bowiem</i><par n="jeśli__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="aczkolwiek"><i>aczkolwiek</i><par n="jeśli__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="więc"><i>więc</i><par n="jeśli__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="chociaż"><i>chociaż</i><par n="jeśli__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="mimo że"><i>mimo<b/>że</i><par n="jeśli__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="nie wspominając już"><i>nie<b/>wspominając<b/>już</i><par n="jeśli__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="w tym zakresie"><i>w<b/>tym<b/>zakresie</i><par n="jeśli__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="nasz"><i>nas</i><par n="nas/z__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="wasz"><i>was</i><par n="nas/z__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="nasz"><i>nas</i><par n="nas/z__det"/></e>
    <e lm="wasz"><i>was</i><par n="nas/z__det"/></e>
    <e lm="kiedy"><i>kiedy</i><par n="gdzie__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="gdy"><i>gdy</i><par n="gdzie__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="dokąd"><i>dokąd</i><par n="gdzie__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="jak tylko"><i>jak<b/>tylko</i><par n="gdzie__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="skąd"><i>skąd</i><par n="gdzie__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="odkąd"><i>odkąd</i><par n="gdzie__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="gdzie"><i>gdzie</i><par n="gdzie__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="co"><i>co</i><par n="co__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="po co"><i>po<b/>co</i><par n="gdzie__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="jak"><i>jak</i><par n="gdzie__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kiedy"><i>kiedy</i><par n="gdzie__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="czy"><i>czy</i><par n="gdzie__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dokąd"><i>dokąd</i><par n="gdzie__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="skąd"><i>skąd</i><par n="gdzie__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="którędy"><i>którędy</i><par n="gdzie__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dlaczego"><i>dlaczego</i><par n="gdzie__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ile razy"><i>ile<b/>razy</i><par n="gdzie__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="źle"><i>źle</i><par n="dobrze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="często"><p><l>często</l><r>często</r></p><par n="dobrze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="naturalnie"><i>naturalnie</i><par n="dobrze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="przeciętnie"><i>przeciętnie</i><par n="dobrze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="uroczyście"><i>uroczyście</i><par n="dobrze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="paradoksalnie"><i>paradoksalnie</i><par n="dobrze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="drastycznie"><i>drastycznie</i><par n="dobrze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="wzniośle"><i>wzniośle</i><par n="dobrze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="za darmo"><i>za<b/>darmo</i><par n="tu__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="telefonicznie"><i>telefonicznie</i><par n="tu__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="niech"><i>niech</i><par n="tu__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="na zawsze"><i>na<b/>zawsze</i><par n="tu__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bezpośrednio"><i>bezpośrednio</i><par n="tu__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kilkakrotnie"><i>kilkakrotnie</i><par n="tu__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="wyłącznie"><i>wyłącznie</i><par n="tu__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="relatywnie"><i>relatywnie</i><par n="tu__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="zbyt"><i>zbyt</i><par n="zbyt__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="zbytnio"><i>zbytnio</i><par n="zbyt__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="nazbyt"><i>nazbyt</i><par n="zbyt__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="za"><i>za</i><par n="zbyt__preadv"/></e>
